Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 15. Mississippi Telephone Solicitation Act.

§ 77-3-701.
Short title

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Telephone Solicitation Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 77-3-703.
Legislative findings

The use of the telephone to make all types of solicitations to consumers is pervasive. This article gives consumers a tool by which to object to telemarketing calls and text messages, as these communications can amount to a nuisance, an invasion of privacy, and can create a health and safety risk for certain consumers who maintain their phone service primarily for emergency medical situations.

Any calls made for political purposes shall be governed by Section 23-15-875.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 322, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 77-3-705.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this article, the following words and terms shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Consumer” means a person or business that receives a telephone call or text message from a telephone solicitor.

“Caller identification service” means a type of telephone service which permits a telephone subscriber to view the telephone number and name of the person or entity making an incoming telephone call or text message.

“Telephone solicitor” means any person, firm, entity, organization, partnership, association, corporation, charitable entity, or a subsidiary or affiliate thereof, who engages in any type of telephone solicitation on his or her own behalf or through representatives, independent contractors, salespersons, agents, automated dialing systems, text messaging systems, or any other machines or other individuals or systems.

“Telephone solicitation” means any voice or text message communication over the telephone line or cellular network of a consumer for the purpose of:

Encouraging the purchase or rental of, or investment in, property;

Soliciting a sale of any consumer goods or services, or an extension of credit for consumer goods or services;

Soliciting any other item of value, pecuniary or otherwise, regardless of whether a sales presentation is made; or

Soliciting a charitable contribution of money or property.

“Commission” means the Mississippi Public Service Commission.

“Doing business in this state” refers to businesses which conduct telephone solicitations from any location to consumers located in this state.

“Consumer goods or services” means any real property or any tangible or intangible personal property which is normally used for personal, family or household purposes, including, without limitation, any property intended to be attached to, or installed in, any real property, and any services related to the property.

“Established business relationship” means a prior or existing relationship formed by a voluntary two-way communication between a person or entity and a consumer, with or without an exchange of consideration, on the basis of an inquiry, application, purchase or transaction by the consumer, which relationship is currently existing or was terminated within six (6) months of the telephone solicitation; however, the act of purchasing consumer goods or services under an extension of credit does not create an existing business relationship between the consumer and the entity extending credit to the consumer for such purchase. The term does not include the situation wherein the consumer has merely been subject to a telephone solicitation by or at the behest of the telephone solicitor within the six (6) months immediately preceding the contemplated telephone solicitation.

“Charitable organization” means any person or entity holding itself out to be established for any benevolent, educational, philanthropic, humane, scientific, patriotic, social welfare or advocacy, public health, environmental or conservation, civic or other eleemosynary purpose or for the benefit of law enforcement personnel, firefighters, or any other persons who protect the public safety, or for any other purpose where a charitable appeal is the basis of the solicitation.

“Sales presentation” means attempting to obtain something of value, pecuniary or otherwise, regardless of whether consideration is or is expected to be exchanged.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 3; Laws, 2016, ch. 322, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2019, ch. 471, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 77-3-707.
Use of the “no-calls” database by telephone solicitors mandatory.

Except as otherwise provided pursuant to Section 77-3-709 or 77-3-711, a telephone solicitor may not make or cause to be made any telephone solicitation to any consumer in this state unless the telephone solicitor has purchased the “no-calls” database from the commission or the entity under contract with the commission.

Except as otherwise provided pursuant to Section 77-3-709 or 77-3-711, a telephone solicitor may not make or cause to be made any telephone solicitation to any consumer in this state who has given notice to the commission, or the entity under contract with the commission, of his or her objection to receiving telephone solicitations.

The commission, or an entity under contract with the commission, shall establish and operate a “no-calls” database composed of a list of telephone numbers of consumers who have given notice of their objection to receiving telephone solicitations. The “no-calls” database may be operated by the commission or by another entity under contract with the commission.

Each local exchange company and each competing local exchange carrier shall provide written notification on a semiannual basis to each of its consumers of the opportunity to provide notification to the commission, or the entity under contract with the commission, that the consumer objects to receiving telephone solicitations. The notification must be disseminated at the option of the carrier, by television, radio or newspaper advertisements, written correspondence, bill inserts or messages, a publication in the consumer information pages of the local telephone directory, or any other method not expressly prohibited by the commission.

A telephone solicitor may not violate the Caller ID Anti-Spoofing Act in Section 77-3-801 et seq., and if in violation of such act, he shall also be in violation of this article. In addition to any remedies or penalties otherwise provided by law, such telephone solicitor shall be subject to any remedies or penalties available for a violation of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2019, ch. 487, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 77-3-709.
Commission’s discretion to exempt some telephone solicitors from purchase and use of no-calls database.

The commission, in its discretion, may allow telephone solicitors to make telephone solicitations without requiring them to purchase the “no-calls” database, and regardless of whether a telephone solicitation may be made to a consumer who has given notice of his objection to receiving such solicitations, provided that it adopts a written policy incorporating the following criteria:

The telephone solicitor must demonstrate to the commission that its proposed telephone solicitation is reasonably related to an established business relationship as defined in Section 77-3-705(h), or is being made in response to an invitation or notice from a consumer which clearly signifies that he is open to a contact being initiated;

The telephone solicitation is to be made by a person or entity for the purpose of soliciting a contribution or donation to a bona fide nonprofit corporation, regardless of whether consumer goods or services will be provided to the consumer in return for the contribution or donation; or

The consumer will not be telephoned for a telephone solicitation as defined in Section 77-3-705(d), but he will be telephoned for a bona fide religious or charitable purpose, including an invitation to attend an event or a request for a contribution or donation.

In all cases, the telephone solicitor must demonstrate that it will not use an automated dialing system or a method that will block or otherwise circumvent the consumer’s use of a caller identification service.

In making its determination of whether to allow a telephone solicitation to be made under the policy which will include the limitations set forth in this section, the commission shall exercise due care in investigating previous conduct of the telephone solicitor seeking such authority. The commission may deny any telephone solicitor the privilege of making telephone solicitations under this section, notwithstanding that any of the criteria set forth in this section have been met.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 77-3-711.
Exempt categories.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to:

A person soliciting:

Who does not make the major sales presentation during the telephone solicitation;

Without the intent to complete or obtain provisional acceptance of a sale, a charitable contribution, or the payment of some other item of value, pecuniary or otherwise, during the telephone solicitation; or

Without the intent to complete, and who does not complete, the sales presentation during the telephone solicitation, but who completes the sales presentation at a later face-to-face meeting between the person soliciting and the prospective purchaser or consumer.

A person who is a licensee under Chapter 35, Title 73, Mississippi Code of 1972, who is a resident of the State of Mississippi, and whose telephone solicitation is for the sole purpose of selling, exchanging, purchasing, renting, listing for sale or rent or leasing real estate in connection with his real estate license and not in conjunction with any other offer.

A motor vehicle dealer as that term is defined in Section 63-17-55, who is a resident of the State of Mississippi and who maintains a current motor vehicle dealer’s license issued by the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission, whose telephone solicitation is for the sole purpose of selling, offering to sell, soliciting or advertising the sale of motor vehicles in connection with his motor vehicle dealer’s license and not in conjunction with any other offer.

An agent as that term is defined in Section 83-17-1 whose telephone solicitation is for the sole purpose of soliciting, consulting, advising, or adjusting in the business of insurance.

A broker-dealer, agent, or investment advisor registered under Chapter 71, Title 75, Mississippi Code of 1972, whose telephone solicitation is for the sole purpose of effecting or attempting to effect the purchase or sale of securities or has the purpose of providing or seeking to provide investment or financial advice.

A person calling on behalf of a charitable organization which is registered under Chapter 11, Title 79, Mississippi Code of 1972, whose telephone solicitation is for the sole purpose of soliciting for the charitable organization and who receives no compensation for his activities on behalf of the organization.

A person calling on behalf of a newspaper of general circulation, whose telephone solicitation is for the sole purpose of soliciting a subscription to the newspaper from, or soliciting the purchase of advertising by, the consumer.

A person calling on behalf of any supervised financial institution or parent, subsidiary or affiliate thereof. As used in this section, “supervised financial institution” means any commercial bank, trust company, savings and loan association, mutual savings bank, credit union, industrial loan company, small loan company, consumer finance lender, commercial finance lender or insurer, provided that the institution has a physical office located in the State of Mississippi and is subject to supervision by an official or agency of the State of Mississippi or of the United States.

A person calling on behalf of a funeral establishment licensed under Section 73-11-41, cemetery or monument dealer, if the sole purpose of the telephone solicitation relates to services provided by the funeral or death related establishments in the course of its ordinary business.

Any telephone solicitor who solicits a consumer with whom he has an established business relationship.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 6; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2019, ch. 471, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 77-3-713.
Registration of telephone solicitors mandatory.

All telephone solicitors must register with the commission before conducting any telephone solicitations in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 77-3-715.
Regulatory powers of Public Service Commission.

The commission may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to effectuate this article, including, but not limited to, the following:

The methods by which consumers may give notice to the commission or its contractor of their objection to receive solicitations or revocation of the notice;

The methods by which a notice of objection becomes effective and the effect of a change of telephone number on the notice;

The methods by which objections and revocations are collected and added to the database;

The methods by which a person or entity desiring to make telephone solicitations may obtain access to the database as required to avoid calling the telephone number of consumers included in the database;

The process by which the database is updated, and the frequency of updates;

The process by which telephone solicitors must register with the commission for the purpose of conducting telephonic solicitations in the state;

The establishment of fees to be charged by the commission or its contractor to telephone solicitors for access to or for paper or electronic copies of the database on an annual basis;

The establishment of a written policy which clearly articulates the circumstances under which the commission, in its discretion, may allow exceptions to the provisions of this article pursuant to Section 77-3-703; and

All other matters relating to the database that the commission deems necessary.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 77-3-717.
Inclusion in no-calls database of Mississippi part of any Federal Trade Commission national database.

If the Federal Trade Commission establishes a single national database of telephone numbers of consumers who object to receiving telephone solicitations, the commission must include the portion of the single national database that relates to the State of Mississippi in the database established under this article. Likewise, the commission shall make available the state’s database to the Federal Trade Commission for inclusion in the national database.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 9; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 77-3-719.
Nondisclosure of database.

Information contained in the database established under this article may be used and accessed only for the purpose of compliance with this article and shall not be otherwise subject to public inspection or disclosure.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 77-3-721.
Fees; funding of expenses of agency; deposit of user charges and fees authorized under this section into State General Fund [Repealed effective July 1, 2021]

All fees collected under the provisions of this article shall be deposited into a special fund which is created in the State Treasury to be expended by the commission for the implementation and administration of this article. From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law and as determined by the State Fiscal Officer.

This section shall stand repealed July 1, 2021.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 11; Laws, 2017, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 39, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017).

§ 77-3-723.
Rules for authorized calls.

Any person or entity who makes an authorized telephone solicitation to a consumer in this state shall announce clearly, at the beginning of each call, his or her name, the company he or she represents and the purpose of the call. Such calls may only be made between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m. Central Standard Time. No telephone solicitations may be made on a Sunday. For purposes of this provision, an “authorized telephone solicitation” means a solicitation that is made: (a) to a consumer who is not listed on the most current “no-calls” database; (b) by a telephone solicitor who has been authorized to make such solicitations under the provisions of Section 77-3-709; or (c) by a telephone solicitor who is exempt from this article under the provisions of Section 77-3-711.

A person or entity who makes a telephone solicitation to a consumer in this state may not utilize knowingly any method that blocks or otherwise circumvents the consumer’s use of a caller identification service, nor may the person or entity use an automated dialing system or any like system that uses a recorded voice message to communicate with the consumer unless the person or entity has an established business relationship with the consumer and uses the recorded voice message to inform the consumer about a new product or service.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 77-3-725.
Violations; hearings; penalties.

The commission may investigate alleged violations and initiate proceedings relative to a violation of this article or any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article. Such proceedings include, without limitation, proceedings to issue a cease and desist order, and to issue an order imposing a civil penalty not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for each violation. The commission shall afford an opportunity for a fair hearing to the alleged violator(s) after giving written notice of the time and place for said hearing. Failure to appear at any such hearing may result in the commission finding the alleged violator(s) liable by default. Any telephone solicitor found to have violated this article, pursuant to a hearing or by default, may be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for each violation to be assessed and collected by the commission. Each telephonic communication shall constitute a separate violation.

All penalties collected by the commission shall be deposited in the special fund created under Section 77-3-721 for the administration of this article.

The commission may issue subpoenas, require the production of relevant documents, administer oaths, conduct hearings, and do all things necessary in the course of investigating, determining and adjudicating an alleged violation.

The remedies, duties, prohibitions and penalties set forth under this article shall not be exclusive and shall be in addition to all other causes of action, remedies and penalties provided by law, including, but not limited to, the penalties provided by Section 77-1-53.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2019, ch. 471, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 77-3-727.
Consumer complaints.

Any person who has received a telephone solicitation in violation of this article, or any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article, may file a complaint with the commission. The complaint will be processed pursuant to complaint procedures established by the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 77-3-729.
Defenses.

It shall be a defense in any action or proceeding brought under Section 77-3-725 or 77-3-727 that the defendant has established and implemented, with due care, reasonable practices and procedures to effectively prevent telephone solicitations in violation of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 77-3-731.
Commission granted personal jurisdiction over resident and nonresident telephone solicitors.

The commission is granted personal jurisdiction over any telephone solicitor, whether a resident or a nonresident, notwithstanding that telephone solicitors are not deemed to be a public utility, for the purpose of administering this article. The commission is granted personal jurisdiction over any nonresident telephone solicitor, its executor, administrator, receiver, trustee or any other appointed representative of such nonresident as to an action or proceeding authorized by this article or any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article as authorized by Section 13-3-57, and also upon any nonresident, his or her executor, administrator, receiver, trustee or any other appointed representative of such nonresident who has qualified under the laws of this state to do business herein. Service of summons and process upon the alleged violator of this article shall be had or made as is provided by the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 77-3-733.
Right of appeal.

Any party aggrieved by any final order of the commission pursuant to this article, or any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article, shall have the right of appeal to the Chancery Court of Hinds County, Mississippi, First Judicial District.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 77-3-735.
Service providers certificated by commission not liable for violations of others.

No provider of telephonic caller identification service, local exchange telephone company or long distance company certificated by the commission may be held liable for violations of this article committed by other persons or entities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 77-3-737.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2019, ch. 471, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§77-3-737. [Laws, 2003, ch. 478, § 19; Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 62, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 367, § 19; Laws, 2010, ch. 324, § 19; Laws, 2013, ch. 322, § 19; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2017, ch. 312, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2017.]